Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-225
Railroads; blocking crossings; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any railroad company or for any of its officers, agents, or employees to obstruct with car or cars, with engine or engines, or with any other rolling stock, for more than ten minutes at a time, any public highway, street, or alley in any unincorporated village in the State of Nebraska. Any corporation, person, firm, or individual violating any provision of this section shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined in any sum not less than ten dollars nor more than one hundred dollars.

Laws 1907, c. 109, § 1, p. 384;

Laws 1907, c. 109, § 2, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 5075;

C.S.1922, § 4247;

C.S.1929, § 17-225;

R.S.1943, § 17-225;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 91.